Massachusetts, session 194th, S1662.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7B of chapter 90 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by adding after criteria (18) the following:- "(19) Every
school bus transporting students to or from a public, vocational, private or parochial school shall
be equipped with a seatbelt for each permanent seating accommodation designed and installed in
compliance with United States motor vehicle D.O.T. safety standards."
SECTION 2. A city or town may enact a local ordinance or bylaw requiring that school
buses operating within the municipality must be equipped with seatbelts at an earlier
implementation date.
of 2

SECTION 3. No claim for damages shall arise from the failure of a school bus operator, a
school, school district or municipality to ensure that a passenger of a school bus was wearing the
restraint system prescribed by Sections 7B of Chapter 90 of the general laws.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
of 2